Ohio, session 136, HB559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. (A) As used in this section, "appointing authority" has the same meaning as in section 109.803 of the Revised Code. (B) For a period of one year beginning on the effective date of this section, on request from an appointing authority, the Executive Director of the Ohio Peace Officer Training Commission may waive the requirement under division (M)(2) of section 109.77 of the Revised Code that a re-appointed peace officer complete refresher training prior to performing the functions of a peace officer. The Executive Director shall reply to a request for waiver under this section, indicating whether the Executive Director is granting or denying the request, within thirty days after receiving the request. Section 2. This act is hereby declared to be an emergency measure necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The reason for such necessity is that the required refresher training courses are currently not available. Therefore, this act shall go into immediate effect.